Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 4. General Provisions.

Sec. 47.10.960.
Civil liability.

Failure to comply with a provision of this title does not constitute a basis for civil liability for damages.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a civil action for common law negligence or an action under AS

09.55.580

on behalf of a child who is injured or dies while in the custody of the state.

History.

(§ 42 ch 99 SLA 1998; am § 29 ch 64 SLA 2005; am § 6 ch 38 SLA 2008)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 1, 2005, rewrote this section.

The 2008 amendment, effective May 23, 2008, added subsection (b).

Sec. 47.10.970.
Appropriations.

Funds to carry out this chapter shall be provided for in the general appropriation Act of the legislature.

History.

(§ 1 art IV ch 145 SLA 1957)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

47.10.270

. Renumbered in 1990.

Administrative Code. —

For child foster care payments, see 7 AAC 53, art. 1.

Sec. 47.10.980.
Grants-in-aid.

The department may accept grants-in-aid from the federal government or private foundations and may accept other gifts consistent with the purposes of this chapter.

History.

(§ 44 ch 59 SLA 1996)

Sec. 47.10.990.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“adult family member” means a person who is 18 years of age or older and who is

related to the child as the child’s grandparent, aunt, uncle, or sibling;

the child’s sibling’s legal guardian or parent; or

in the case of an Indian child, an extended family member as defined in 25 U.S.C. 1903;

“care” means to provide for the physical, mental, and social needs of the child;

“child” means a person who is

under 18 years of age;

19 years of age if that person was under 18 years of age at the time that a proceeding under this chapter was commenced; and

under 21 years of age if that person is committed to the custody of the department under AS

47.10.080(c)(1)

or (v);

“child in need of aid” means a child found to be within the jurisdiction of the court under AS

47.10.010

and

47.10.011

;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of health and social services;

“court” means the superior court of the state;

“custodian” means a natural person 18 years of age or older to whom a parent or guardian has transferred temporary physical care, custody, and control of the child for a period of time;

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services;

“domestic violence” has the meaning given in AS

18.66.990

;

“family member” means a person of any age who is

related to the child as the child’s grandparent, aunt, uncle, or sibling;

the child’s sibling’s legal guardian or parent; or

in the case of an Indian child, an extended family member as defined in 25 U.S.C. 1903;

“family support services” means the services and activities provided to children and their families, including those provided by the community, a church, or other service organization, both to prevent removal of a child from the parental home and to facilitate the child’s safe return to the family; “family support services” may include counseling, substance abuse treatment, mental health services, assistance to address domestic violence, visitation with family members, parenting classes, in-home services, temporary child care services, and transportation;

“foster care” means care provided by a person or household under a foster home license required under AS 47.32;

“gravely disabled” has the meaning given in AS

47.30.915

;

“guardian” means a natural person who is legally appointed guardian of the child by the court;

“hazardous volatile material or substance” has the meaning given in AS

47.37.270

;

“Indian child” has the meaning given in 25 U.S.C. 1903;

“Indian child’s tribe” has the meaning given in 25 U.S.C. 1903;

“infant” means a child who is less than 21 days of age;

“intoxicant” means a substance that temporarily diminishes a person’s control over mental or physical powers, including alcohol, controlled substances under AS 11.71, and a hazardous volatile material or substance misused by inhaling its vapors;

“juvenile detention facility ” has the meaning given in AS

47.12.990

;

“mental health professional” has the meaning given in AS

47.30.915

, except that, if the child is placed in another state by the department, “mental health professional” also includes a professional listed in the definition of “mental health professional” in AS

47.30.915

who is not licensed to practice by a board of this state but is licensed by a corresponding licensing authority to practice in the state in which the child is placed;

“mental illness” has the meaning given in AS

47.30.915

;

“mental injury” has the meaning given in AS

47.17.290

;

“near fatality” means physical injury or other harm, as certified by a physician, caused by an act or omission that created a substantial risk of death;

“out-of-home care provider” means a foster parent or relative other than a parent with whom the child is placed;

“parent” means the biological or adoptive parent of the child;

“permanency hearing” means a hearing

designed to reach a decision in a case concerning the permanent placement of a child under AS 47.10; and

at which the direction of the case involving the child is determined;

“physical injury” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900(b)

;

“reasonable efforts” means, with respect to family support services required under AS

47.10.086

, consistent attempts made during a reasonable time period and time-limited services;

“reasonable time” means a period of time that serves the best interests of the child, taking in account the affected child’s age, emotional and developmental needs, and ability to form and maintain lasting attachments;

“secure residential psychiatric treatment center” has the meaning given “residential psychiatric treatment center” in AS

47.32.900

;

“serious physical injury” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900(b)

;

“sexual abuse” means the conduct described in AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.460

; conduct constituting “sexual exploitation” as defined in AS

47.17.290

, and conduct prohibited by AS

11.66.100

—

11.66.150

;

“support” has the meaning given in AS

11.51.120(b)

.

History.

(§ 1 art I ch 145 SLA 1957; am § 5 ch 110 SLA 1967; am §§ 5, 6 ch 27 SLA 1970; am §§ 27 — 28 ch 63 SLA 1977; am §§ 91, 92 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 18 ch 57 SLA 1991; am § 7 ch 72 SLA 1993; am § 15 ch 113 SLA 1994; am § 52 ch 30 SLA 1996; am § 45 ch 59 SLA 1996; am §§ 43 — 45, 69 ch 99 SLA 1998; am § 14 ch 107 SLA 1998; am §§ 23, 24 ch 57 SLA 2005; am §§ 30, 31 ch 64 SLA 2005; am § 6 ch 1 SLA 2008; am § 3 ch 80 SLA 2010; am §§ 10 — 12 ch 6 4SSLA 2016 ch 6 4SSLA 2016; am § 18 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

47.20.290

. Renumbered in 1990. Reorganized in 1984 to alphabetize the terms defined and again in 1986, 1993, 1994, 1996, 1998, 2005, 2008, and 2016 to maintain alphabetical order. Section 15,
ch. 113, SLA 1994 added a new paragraph (13) that was not set out because it duplicated a definition of “victim” enacted in 1991 and repealed in 1996.

Cross references. —

For provision providing legislative findings and intent for the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 1,
ch. 6, 4SSLA 2016 in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 6, 4SSLA 2016 (HB 374) which added the 2016 amendments to this section, see 2016 House Journal 974 — 976.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, effective July 1, 2005, in paragraph (16) [now (19)] added the language beginning “, except that” to the end of the paragraph and added paragraphs (28) — (31) [now (1), (10), (22), and (23) respectively].

The second 2005 amendment, effective July 2, 2005, updated a section reference in paragraphs (10) [now (12)] and (24) [now (29)] and inserted “ ‘residential psychiatric treatment center’ ” in paragraph (24) [now (29)].

The 2008 amendment, effective May 11, 2008, added paragraph (32) [now (16)].

The 2010 amendment, effective January 1, 2011, rewrote (3).

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, added (1)(C), (10)(C), (33) and (34) [now (16) and (17)] and made related changes.

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, in (20) substituted “facility has the meaning given in AS

47.12.990

” for “home is a separate establishment, exclusively devoted to the detention of minors on a short-term basis and not a part of an adult jail”.

Editor's notes.—

Under sec. 18,
ch. 6, 4SSLA 2016, the 2016 amendments to this section "apply to proceedings for adoption or legal guardianship of a child in state custody under
AS 47.10 filed on or after January 1, 2017."